apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГҐДЕЄЖЗИІЇЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЮЯЬабвгґдеєжзиіїйклмнопрстуфхцчшщюяь</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="іменник"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Прикметник"/>
    
    <sdef n="f"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="m"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="ani"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="однина"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="множина"/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="називний"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="родовий"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="давальний"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="знахідний"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="орудний"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="місцевий"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="кличний"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>

    <sdef n="prn"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="det"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="qnt"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="rel"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c=""/>

    <sdef n="pprep"  c=""/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c=""/>

    <sdef n="pr"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c=""/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c=""/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ij"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="vbser"  c="бути"/>
    <sdef n="imperf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="perf"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="fut"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="cni"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="impers" c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="past"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="psv"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pprs"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="act"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="num"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="np"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="top"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="cog"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="hyd"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="cpd"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="sint"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c=""/>
  </sdefs>  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__англійський">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="ani"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ім</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ої</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ій</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ою</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ій</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ім</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ими</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="про__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="де__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ні__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="а__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="якщо__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ст/о__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="про"><i>про</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iз"><i>iз</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="з"><i>з</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="без"><i>без</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="до"><i>до</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="через"><i>через</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="спасибі за"><i>спасибо<b/>за</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="о" r="LR"><i>о</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="о" r="RL"><p><l><a/>о</l><r>о</r></p><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="о" r="LR"><p><l>об</l><r>о</r></p><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="з-під"><i>з-під</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="із-за"><i>із-за</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="після"><i>після</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="зовні"><i>зовні</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="усередині"><i>усередині</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="для"><i>для</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="напередодні"><i>напередодні</i><par n="про__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="и"><i>и</i><par n="а__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="якщо"><i>якщо</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="тому що"><i>тому<b/>що</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="так як"><i>так<b/>як</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="після того, як"><i>після<b/>того,<b/>як</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="хоча"><i>хоча</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="щоб"><i>щоб</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="поки"><i>поки</i><par n="якщо__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="де"><i>де</i><par n="де__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="як"><i>як</i><par n="де__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ні"><i>ні</i><par n="ні__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="сто"><i>ст</i><par n="ст/о__num"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
